California, session 20252026, AB2791.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4584 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4584. Upon determining that this exemption is consistent with the purposes of this chapter, the board may exempt from this chapter, or portions of this chapter, a person engaged in forest management whose activities are limited to any of the following:(a) The cutting or removal of trees for the purpose of constructing or maintaining a right-of-way for utility lines.(b) The planting, growing, nurturing, shaping, shearing, removal, or harvest of immature trees for Christmas trees or other ornamental purposes or minor forest products, including fuelwood.(c) The cutting or removal of dead, dying, or diseased trees of any size.(d) Site preparation.(e) Maintenance of drainage facilities and soil stabilization treatments.(f) Timber operations on land managed by the Department of Parks and Recreation.(g) (1) The one-time conversion of less than three acres to a nontimber use. A person, whether acting as an individual, as a member of a partnership, or as an officer or employee of a corporation or other legal entity, shall not obtain more than one exemption pursuant to this subdivision in a five-year period. If a partnership has as a member, or if a corporation or other legal entity has as an officer or employee, a person who has received this exemption within the past five years, whether as an individual, as a member of a partnership, or as an officer or employee of a corporation or other legal entity, then that partnership, corporation, or other legal entity is not eligible for this exemption. “Person,” for purposes of this subdivision, means an individual, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity.(2) (A) Notwithstanding Section 4554.5, the board shall adopt regulations that do all of the following:(i) Identify the required documentation of a bona fide intent to complete the conversion that an applicant will need to submit in order to be eligible for the exemption in paragraph (1).(ii) Authorize the department to inspect the sites approved in conversion applications that have been approved on or after January 1, 2002, in order to determine that the conversion was completed within the two-year period described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 1104.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(iii) Require the exemption pursuant to this subdivision to expire if there is a change in timberland ownership. The person who originally submitted an application for an exemption pursuant to this subdivision shall notify the department of a change in timberland ownership on or before five calendar days after a change in ownership.(iv) The board may adopt regulations allowing a waiver of the five-year limitation described in paragraph (1) upon finding that the imposition of the five-year limitation would impose an undue hardship on the applicant for the exemption. The board may adopt a process for an appeal of a denial of a waiver.(v) The board may adopt regulations allowing a waiver of the one-time limitation described in paragraph (1) upon finding that the imposition of the one-time limitation would impose an undue hardship on the applicant. The board may adopt a process for an appeal of a denial of a waiver.(B) The application form for the exemption pursuant to paragraph (1) shall prominently advise the public that a violation of the conversion exemption, including a conversion applied for in the name of someone other than the person or entity implementing the conversion in bona fide good faith, is a violation of this chapter and penalties may accrue up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 4601).(h) An easement granted by a right-of-way construction agreement administered by the federal government if timber sales and operations within or affecting the area are reviewed and conducted pursuant to the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.).(i) (1) The cutting or removal of trees in compliance with Sections 4290 and 4291 that eliminates the vertical continuity of vegetative fuels and the horizontal continuity of tree crowns for the purpose of reducing flammable materials and maintaining a fuel break for a distance of not more than 150 feet on each side from an approved and legally permitted structure that complies with the California Building Standards Code, when that cutting or removal is conducted in compliance with this subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, an “approved and legally permitted structure” includes only structures that are designed for human occupancy, garages, barns, stables, and structures used to enclose fuel tanks.(2) (A) The cutting or removal of trees pursuant to this subdivision is limited to cutting or removal that will result in a reduction in the rate of fire spread, fire duration and intensity, fuel ignitability, or ignition of the tree crowns and shall be in accordance with any regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this section.(B) Trees shall not be cut or removed pursuant to this subdivision by the clearcutting regeneration method, by the seed tree removal step of the seed tree regeneration method, or by the shelterwood removal step of the shelterwood regeneration method.(3) (A) All fuel treatments conducted pursuant to this subdivision that do not comply with board rules and regulations may be determined to be a nuisance and subject to abatement by the department or the city or county having jurisdiction.(B) The costs incurred by the department, city, or county, as the case may be, to abate the nuisance upon a parcel of land subject to the timber operations, including, but not limited to, investigation, boundary determination, measurement, and other related costs, may be recovered by special assessment and lien against the parcel of land by the department, city, or county. The assessment may be collected at the same time and in the same manner as ordinary ad valorem taxes, and shall be subject to the same penalties and the same procedure and sale in case of delinquency as is provided for ad valorem taxes.(4) All timber operations conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall conform to applicable city or county general plans, city or county implementing ordinances, and city or county zoning ordinances. This paragraph does not authorize the cutting, removal, or sale of timber or other solid wood forest products within an area where timber harvesting is prohibited or otherwise restricted pursuant to the rules or regulations adopted by the board.(5) (A) The board shall adopt regulations, initially as emergency regulations in accordance with subparagraph (B), that the board considers necessary to implement and to obtain compliance with this subdivision.(B) The emergency regulations adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare.(j) (1) (A) The harvesting of trees, limited to those trees that eliminate the vertical continuity of vegetative fuels and the horizontal continuity of tree crowns, for the purpose of reducing the rate of fire spread, duration and intensity, fuel ignitability, or ignition of tree crowns. An exemption pursuant to this paragraph shall be known as the Forest Resilience Exemption.(B) The board may authorize an exemption pursuant to subparagraph (A) only if the tree harvesting will decrease fuel continuity and increase the quadratic mean diameter of the stand, and the tree harvesting area will not exceed 500 acres. Increases in quadratic mean diameter shall only consider trees greater than eight inches in diameter at breast height. The notice of exemption may be authorized only if all of the conditions specified in subparagraphs (C) to (I), inclusive, are met.(C) A registered professional forester shall prepare the notice of exemption and submit it to the director.(D) (i) The submitted notice of exemption shall include a description of the preharvest stand structure and a statement of the postharvest stand stocking levels and the expected postharvest increase in quadratic mean diameter.(ii) The level of residual stocking shall be consistent with maximum sustained production of high-quality timber products. The residual stand shall consist primarily of healthy and vigorous dominant and codominant trees from the preharvest stand. Stocking shall not be reduced below the standards required by the following provisions that apply to the exemption at issue:(I) Clauses 1 to 4, inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Sections 913.3, 933.3, and 953.3 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, or clauses 1 to 4, inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Sections 913.2, 933.2, and 953.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(II) The registered professional forester responsible for preparing the notice of exemption shall identify the designated postharvest stocking within the notice of exemption. The selected stocking shall be applicable to, and consistent with, silviculture that would apply to the preharvest stand condition provided pursuant to clause (i).(III) Additional information on preharvest stand conditions, including, but not limited to, stand ages, stand structure, past management activities, and landowner goals and objectives shall also be provided by the registered professional forester preparing and submitting the exemption that substantiates the selection of postharvest stocking.(iii) Within the coast district, if the preharvest dominant and codominant crown canopy is occupied by trees less than 14 inches in diameter at breast height, a minimum of 100 trees over 4 inches in diameter at breast height shall be retained per acre for Site I, II, and III lands, and a minimum of 75 trees over 4 inches in diameter at breast height shall be retained per acre for Site IV and V lands.(iv) Within the northern district and southern district, if the preharvest dominant and codominant crown canopy is occupied by trees less than 14 inches in diameter at breast height, a minimum of 65 trees per acre over 4 inches in diameter at breast height shall be retained.(v) All trees that are harvested or all trees that are retained shall be marked or sample marked by, or under the supervision of, a registered professional forester before felling operations begin. The board shall adopt regulations for sample marking for this section in Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations. Sample marking shall be limited to homogenous forest stand conditions typical of plantations.(vi) The board may adopt specific regulations for the removal of dead and dying trees in amounts less than 10 percent of the average volume per acre for trees up to 36 inches in diameter at breast height. Regulations adopted by the board shall consider safety, fuel hazard abatement, mortality capture, the adequacy and retention of wildlife trees, especially those trees over 30 inches in diameter at breast height, and standards of enforceability for the department. All trees over 30 inches in diameter at breast height that are harvested pursuant to this paragraph shall be marked by, or under the supervision of, a registered professional forester before felling. The registered professional forester shall consult with the director before felling any dead or dying trees in excess of 30 inches in diameter at breast height.(vii) The six largest trees per acre within the boundaries of a notice of exemption submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall not be harvested.(viii) No trees of the genus Quercus that are greater than 22 inches in diameter at breast height shall be harvested under a notice of exemption submitted pursuant to this subdivision, except for those trees that need to be removed to mitigate safety.(ix) The postharvest composition of tree species shall be representative of the preharvest stand condition and demonstrate progression towards climax forest conditions, unless the registered professional forester provides information explaining how modification of species diversity will benefit forest health and resiliency.(E) (i) The board shall adopt regulations for the treatment of understory vegetation and standing dead fuels, canopy closure, clearance to base of live crown, or ladder fuels, that could promote the spread of wildfire.(ii) Slash and woody debris within 50 feet of a public road or critical infrastructure, as defined by the board, shall be chipped, burned, or removed.(iii) The standards required by clauses (i) and (ii) shall be achieved on approximately 80 percent of the treated area.(F)  Before the submission of a notice of exemption to the department, the registered professional forester responsible for submitting the notice shall designate temporary road locations, landing locations, tractor road crossings of Class III watercourses, unstable areas, or connected headwall swales on the ground and map their locations.(G) The construction or reconstruction of temporary roads on slopes of 30 percent or less shall be allowed if all of the following conditions are met:(i) Temporary roads or landings shall not be located on unstable areas, as defined in Section 895.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(ii) Temporary roads shall be single-lane in width.(iii) Temporary roads shall not be located across a connected headwall swale, as defined in Section 895.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(iv) Construction or reconstruction of temporary roads, landings, or watercourse crossings shall not occur during the winter operating period. Pursuant to subdivision (g) of Sections 923.6, 943.6, and 963.6, as applicable, of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, roads and landings used for log hauling or other heavy equipment uses during the winter period shall occur on a stable operating surface and, where necessary, be surfaced with rock to a depth and quantity sufficient to maintain the stable operating surface. Use shall be prohibited on roads that are not hydrologically disconnected and exhibit saturated soil conditions. Timber operations during the winter period shall comply with paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) of Sections 914.7, 934.7, and 954.7, as applicable, of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(v) Use of temporary roads shall comply with the operational provisions of Article 12 (commencing with Section 923) of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 4 of Division 1.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, and recognize guidance on hydrologic disconnection in Technical Rule Addendum Number 5.(vi) No logging road or landings construction or reconstruction activities of any kind shall occur within 200 feet of Class I and Class II watercourses or within 50 feet of a Class III watercourse.(vii) The landowner shall retain a registered professional forester who is available to provide professional advice to the licensed timber operator and timberland owner throughout the active timber operations. The name, address, telephone number, and registration number of the retained registered professional forester shall be provided on the submitted notice of exemption. This professional advice shall include overseeing the construction or reconstruction of any temporary roads or landings and advising on necessary mitigation to avoid potential impacts to associated watershed and forest resources. The registered professional forester shall also comply with Section 1035.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, relating to interaction between the licensed timber operator and the registered professional forester.(viii) The registered professional forester responsible for submitting the notice of exemption shall affirm that the construction or reconstruction of each temporary road is necessary to provide access to harvest areas where no feasible alternative exists. The submitted notice of exemption shall include the number and cumulative length of temporary roads that will be constructed or reconstructed.(ix) (I) Temporary road construction or reconstruction shall be limited to no more than two miles of road per ownership in a planning watershed per any five-year period.(II) For each exemption affecting less than 40 acres, all temporary roads constructed or reconstructed under this exemption shall not exceed a cumulative length of 300 feet.(III) For each exemption affecting between 40 and 80 acres, all temporary roads constructed or reconstructed under this exemption shall not exceed a cumulative length of between 300 and 600 feet, as determined on a pro rata basis by the total acreage affected by the exemption.(IV) For each exemption affecting over 80 acres, all temporary roads constructed or reconstructed under the exemption shall not exceed a cumulative length of 600 feet. The submitted notice of exemption shall list the number of acres affected and the cumulative length of the road in feet.(V) Temporary roads constructed or reconstructed under this exemption shall not be connected to other temporary roads constructed under previous or subsequent exemptions filed under this paragraph.(VI) All temporary roads shall be abandoned using proactive measures that have been applied to effectively remove them from the permanent road network, in accordance with the definition of abandoned road as defined in Section 895.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(VII) This paragraph shall not be interpreted to permit road construction or reconstruction except as authorized under the Forest Resilience Exemption, pursuant to this subparagraph.(VIII) No trees larger than 30 inches in diameter at breast height shall be removed for the purposes of road construction or reconstruction under a notice of exemption submitted pursuant to this subdivision.(H) Only trees less than 30 inches in diameter at breast height may be removed. The board, in consultation with the department, shall develop clearly written guidance documents on inspection and enforceability standards relating to standards set forth in this paragraph.(I) All timber operations conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall only occur within the most recent version of the department’s Fire Hazard Severity Zone Map in the moderate, high, and very high fire threat zones.(J) If pesticides or herbicides will be used within the boundaries of an area covered by a notice of exemption pursuant to this subparagraph within one year of director acceptance, the timberland owner shall notify the appropriate regional water quality control board 10 days before application of any pesticides or herbicides.(K) After the timber operations are complete, the department shall conduct an onsite inspection to determine compliance with this subdivision and whether appropriate enforcement action should be initiated. The department shall notify the appropriate regional water quality control board, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and the California Geological Survey seven days prior to conducting the onsite inspection. The regional water quality control board, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and the California Geological Survey may conduct an inspection with the department.(2) (A) The board shall adopt regulations, initially as emergency regulations in accordance with subparagraph (B), that the board considers necessary to implement and to obtain compliance with this subdivision.(B) The emergency regulations adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare.(3) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2031.(k) (1) The cutting or removal of trees to restore and conserve California black or Oregon white oak woodlands and associated grasslands, if all of the following requirements are met:(A) A registered professional forester shall prepare the notice of exemption and submit it to the director. The notice shall include both of the following:(i) A certification signed by the registered professional forester that the timber operation is designed to restore and conserve California black and Oregon white oak woodlands and associated grasslands encroached upon by conifers and that a minimum of 35 square feet of basal area per acre, or as determined by the board, of California black or Oregon white oak, or both, occupy the proposed treatment area at the time the notice is prepared.(ii) A description of the preharvest stand structure and a statement of the postharvest stand stocking levels.(B) No tree larger than 30 inches in diameter at breast height shall be harvested for commercial purposes. If necessary to achieve the oak woodland restoration goal of the exemption, trees larger than 30 inches in diameter at breast height may be harvested. The registered professional forester shall provide information on the need to remove these trees, and consult with the director before felling any tree in excess of 30 inches in diameter at breast height.(C) Only conifers within 300 feet of a California black or Oregon white oak may be harvested.(D) The total area exempted pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed 300 acres per ownership in a planning watershed per five-year period.(E) Conifer shall be reduced to less than 25 percent of the combined hardwood and conifer postharvest stand stocking levels. Decadent and deformed trees of wildlife value that are retained shall not count toward basal area requirements.(F) No more than 20 percent of the total basal area of preexisting oak stock shall be cut or removed during harvest. The board may establish minimum postharvest basal area requirements for California black or Oregon white oak.(G) Slash shall be configured to minimize the risk of fire mortality to the remaining oak trees.(2) (A) The board shall adopt regulations, initially as emergency regulations in accordance with subparagraph (B), that the board considers necessary to implement and to obtain compliance with this subdivision.(B) The emergency regulations adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare.(l) (1) The board may exempt from this chapter, or portions of this chapter, a person engaged in forest management whose activities are limited to the cutting or removal of trees on the person’s property in compliance with Sections 4290 and 4291 that eliminates the vertical continuity of vegetative fuels and the horizontal continuity of tree crowns for the purpose of reducing flammable materials and maintaining a fuel break for a distance of not more than 300 feet on each side from an approved and legally permitted habitable structure, when that cutting or removal is conducted in compliance with this subdivision and all of the following conditions are met:(A) The notice of exemption is prepared, signed, and submitted by a registered professional forester to the department.(B) For the areas between 150 and 300 feet from the habitable structure, the operations meet all of the following provisions:(i) The residual stocking standards are consistent with Sections 913.2, 933.2, and 953.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as appropriate.(ii) Activities within this area will increase the quadratic mean diameter of the stand.(iii) The residual stand consists primarily of healthy and vigorous dominant and codominant trees from the preharvest stand, well distributed throughout the harvested area.(iv) Postharvest slash treatment and stand conditions will lead to more moderate fire behavior in the professional judgment of the registered professional forester who submits the notice of exemption.(v) Any additional guidance for slash treatment and postharvest stand conditions and any other issues deemed necessary that are consistent with this section, as established by the board.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “habitable structure” means a building that contains one or more dwelling units or that can be occupied for residential use. Buildings occupied for residential use include single-family homes, multidwelling structures, mobile and manufactured homes, and condominiums. For purposes of this subdivision, “habitable structure” does not include commercial, industrial, or incidental buildings such as detached garages, barns, outdoor sanitation facilities, and sheds.(3) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2031.SEC. 2. Section 30109.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:30109.5. “Nonprofit organization” means a private, nonprofit organization that qualifies under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986.SEC. 3. Section 30327.5 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30327.5. (a) An interested person shall not give, convey, or make available gifts aggregating more than ten dollars ($10) in a calendar month to a commissioner or a member of the commission’s staff.(b) A commissioner or member of the commission’s staff shall not accept gifts aggregating more than ten dollars ($10) in a calendar month from an interested person.(c) For purposes of this section, “interested person” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 30323.(d) For purposes of this section, “gift” means, except as provided in subdivision (e), a payment, as defined in Section 82044 of the Government Code, that confers a personal benefit on the recipient, to the extent that consideration of equal or greater value is not received and includes a rebate or discount in the price of anything of value unless the rebate or discount is made in the regular course of business to members of the public without regard to official status. A person, other than a defendant in a criminal action, who claims that a payment is not a gift by reason of receipt of consideration has the burden of proving that the consideration received is of equal or greater value.(e) For purposes of this section, “gift” does not include any of the following:(1) A gift that is not used and that, within 30 days after receipt, is either returned to the donor or delivered to a nonprofit organization, without being claimed as a charitable contribution for tax purposes.(2) A gift from an individual’s spouse, child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, parent-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, nephew, niece, aunt, uncle, or first cousin, or the spouse of one of those individuals. However, a gift from one of those people shall be considered a gift if the donor is acting as an agent or intermediary for a person not covered in this paragraph.(3) A cost associated with the provision of evidentiary material provided to the commission and its staff.(4) An educational or training activity that has received prior approval from the commission.(5) A field trip or site inspection that is made available on equal terms and conditions to all commissioners and appropriate staff.(6) A reception or purely social event that is not offered in connection with or is not intended to influence a decision or action of the commission and that is open to all commissioners, members of the staff, and members of the public and press.SEC. 4. Section 30519 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30519. (a) Except for appeals to the commission, as provided in Section 30603, after a local coastal program, or any portion thereof, has been certified and all implementing actions within the area affected have become effective, the development review authority provided for in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600) shall no longer be exercised by the commission over any new development proposed within the area to which the certified local coastal program, or any portion thereof, applies and shall at that time be delegated to the local government that is implementing the local coastal program or any portion thereof.(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any development proposed or undertaken on any tidelands, submerged lands, or on public trust lands, whether filled or unfilled, lying within the coastal zone, nor shall it apply to any development proposed or undertaken within ports covered by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 30700) or within any state university within the coastal zone; however, this section shall apply to any development proposed or undertaken by a port or harbor district or authority on lands or waters granted by the Legislature to a local government whose certified local coastal program includes the specific development plans for the district or authority.(c) The commission may, from time to time, recommend to the appropriate local government local coastal program amendments to accommodate uses of greater than local importance, which uses are not permitted by the applicable certified local coastal program. These uses may be listed generally or the commission may recommend specific uses of greater than local importance for consideration by the appropriate local government.SEC. 5. Section 30600.6.1 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30600.6.1. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall apply:(1) “Applicant” means a public agency, as defined in Section 31017, or a nonprofit organization.(2) “Habitat restoration project” means a project proposed for the sole purpose of restoring or enhancing the ecological function, biodiversity, or resiliency of native habitat.(3) “Public access project” means a project with the primary purpose of creating, enhancing, expanding, or restoring public amenities that provide access to or along the coast.(b) At the request of an applicant for a coastal development permit, a city or county may waive or reduce a coastal development permit fee for a public access project or habitat restoration project. If a city or county rejects a fee waiver or fee reduction request, the applicant may, notwithstanding Section 30519, submit the coastal development permit application directly to the commission.(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impact, address, or change a local coastal plan or program.SEC. 6. Section 30605 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30605. (a) To promote greater efficiency for the planning of any public works or state university or private university development projects, and as an alternative to project-by-project review, public works plans or state university or private university long-range development plans may be submitted to the commission for review in the same manner prescribed for the review of local coastal programs as set forth in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30500).(b) If a public works plan or long-range development plan is submitted before certification of the local coastal programs for the jurisdictions affected by the proposed plan, the commission shall certify whether the proposed plan is consistent with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).(c) The commission shall, by regulation, provide for the submission and distribution to the public, before public hearings on a proposed public works plan or long-range development plan, detailed environmental information sufficient to enable the commission to determine the consistency of the plan with the policies of this division.(d) If a public works plan is submitted after the certification of local coastal programs, the plan shall be certified by the commission only if it finds, after full consultation with the affected local governments, that the proposed plan is in conformity with certified local coastal programs in jurisdictions affected by the proposed public works.(e) Each state university or private university shall coordinate and consult with local government in the preparation of long-range development plans so as to be consistent, to the fullest extent feasible, with the appropriate local coastal program.(f) Where a public works plan or long-range development plan has been certified by the commission, any subsequent review by the commission of a specific project contained in the certified plan shall be limited to imposing conditions consistent with Sections 30607 and 30607.1.(g) (1) When considering the certification of, or an amendment to, a long-range development plan, the commission shall prioritize the provision of active transportation and public transportation facilities over vehicle parking spaces.(2) For student, faculty, or staff housing facilities proposed for inclusion in a long-range development plan, or subject to commission review under a long-range development plan, the commission shall defer to the state university or private university in determining the number of vehicle parking spaces necessary for residents of those facilities.(h) A certified long-range development plan may be amended by the state university or private university, but no amendment shall take effect until it has been certified by the commission. Any proposed amendment shall be submitted to, and processed by, the commission in the same manner as prescribed for amendment of a local coastal program.SEC. 7. Section 30605.1 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30605.1. (a) The executive director of the commission may determine that a proposed amendment to a public works plan or long-range development plan submitted by a state university or private university is de minimis if the executive director determines that the proposed amendment would have no impact, either individually or cumulatively, on coastal resources and is consistent with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).(b) (1) The executive director shall make a determination as to whether the proposed amendment is de minimis within 10 working days of the date of a complete submittal by the state university or private university. If the proposed amendment is determined to be de minimis, the proposed amendment shall be noticed in the agenda of the next regularly scheduled meeting of the commission.(2) If three members of the commission object to the executive director’s determination that the proposed amendment is de minimis, the proposed amendment shall be set for public hearing in accordance with the procedures specified by regulation for amendments to public works plans and long-range development plans or, at the request of the state university or private university, be returned to the state university or private university. If the proposed amendment is set for public hearing, any applicable time requirements shall commence from the date on which the objection to the de minimis determination was made.(3) If three or more members of the commission do not object to the de minimis determination, the amendment shall become part of the certified public works plan or long-range development plan upon adjournment of the commission meeting on that date.SEC. 8. Section 30605.2 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30605.2. The commission shall track and publish on a public portion of its internet website any public works plans or long-range development plans, amendments to public works plans or long-range development plans, and notices of impending development submitted by a state university or private university to the commission for approval. Information provided to the public shall include at least a description of the plan, plan amendment, or notice of impending development, the status of the plan, plan amendment, or notice of impending development in the approval process, any conditions imposed by the commission for approval of the plan, plan amendment, or notice of impending development, and the length of time to approval or denial of the plan, plan amendment, or notice of impending development. Information on the internet website shall be updated no less than monthly.SEC. 9. Section 30606 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30606. Before the commencement of any development pursuant to Section 30605, the public agency proposing the public works project, or state university or private university, shall notify the commission and other interested persons, organizations, and governmental agencies of the impending development and provide data to show that it is consistent with the certified public works plan or long-range development plan. No development shall take place within 30 working days after the notice.SEC. 10. Section 30607.2 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30607.2. (a) Conditions requiring housing for persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, which were incorporated into a coastal development permit issued prior to January 1, 1982, may, at the request of the permittee, be amended or modified by the commission or by a local government having the authority to issue coastal development permits. In approving those amendments or modifications, only those conditions and requirements authorized by Section 65590 of the Government Code may be imposed on the permittee.(b) Any person who, before January 1, 1982, has been issued a coastal development permit which contains requirements for low- and moderate-income housing but who, prior to January 1, 1982, has not performed substantial work on the development site (such as grading, installation of streets, sewers, or utilities, or construction of major buildings) may elect to proceed under either of the following options:(1) To proceed pursuant to all of the requirements of the coastal development permit, in which event the provisions of subdivision (a) shall apply to any subsequent request to amend or alter the coastal development permit in regard to housing requirements.(2) To proceed without complying with the housing requirements contained in the coastal development permit, in which event the housing requirements for the development shall be governed by Section 65590 of the Government Code.(c)  No new coastal development permit or amendment to any existing permit for a sewer project shall be denied, restricted, or conditioned by the commission in order to implement housing policies or programs.(d) Nothing in this section authorizes or requires the modification of or amendment to any terms or conditions of any previously issued coastal development permit which guarantees housing opportunities for persons and families of low or moderate income where the term or condition has been met through an agreement executed and recorded on or before January 1, 1982, between an applicant and the commission. For previously approved or issued permits which involve new construction of less than 10 residential units, an executed and recorded agreement guaranteeing housing opportunities for persons or families of low or moderate income, which has not been implemented by the transfer of an interest in real property or payment of a fee to a public agency or nonprofit organization for the purpose of providing these housing opportunities, shall be voided if the applicant records the notice provided by the executive director of the commission. Further, nothing in this section impairs the commission’s authority to deny, restrict, or condition new permits or amendments to existing permits based on any requirement of this division.(e) Nothing in this section authorizes or requires the modification of or amendment to any terms or conditions in Permit #P-80-419 issued by the commission with respect to the reservation or administration of sewer capacity for affordable housing in the San Mateo County local coastal program.SEC. 11. Section 30620 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30620. (a) By January 30, 1977, the commission shall, consistent with this chapter, prepare interim procedures for the submission, review, and appeal of coastal development permit applications and of claims of exemption. These procedures shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) Application and appeal forms.(2) Reasonable provisions for notification to the commission and other interested persons of an action taken by a local government pursuant to this chapter, in sufficient detail to ensure that a preliminary review of that action for conformity with this chapter can be made.(3) Interpretive guidelines designed to assist local governments, the commission, and persons subject to this chapter in determining how the policies of this division shall be applied in the coastal zone before the certification, and through the preparation and amendment, of local coastal programs. However, the guidelines shall not supersede, enlarge, or diminish the powers or authority of the commission or any other public agency.(b) No later than May 1, 1977, the commission shall, after public hearing, adopt permanent procedures that include the components specified in subdivision (a) and shall transmit a copy of those procedures to each local government within the coastal zone and make them readily available to the public. After May 1, 1977, the commission may, from time to time, and, except in cases of emergency, after public hearing, modify or adopt additional procedures or guidelines that the commission determines to be necessary to better carry out the purposes of this division.(c) (1) The commission may require a reasonable filing fee and the reimbursement of expenses for the processing by the commission of an application for a coastal development permit under this division and, except for local coastal program submittals, for any other filing, including, but not limited to, a request for revocation, categorical exclusion, or boundary adjustment, that is submitted for review by the commission.(2) A coastal development permit fee that is collected by the commission under paragraph (1) shall be deposited in the Coastal Act Services Fund established pursuant to Section 30620.1. This paragraph does not authorize an increase in fees or create any new authority on the part of the commission.(3) (A) The commission may waive the filing fee for an application for a coastal development permit or permit amendment required under this division.(B) When considering a request for a waiver of a filing fee pursuant to this paragraph, the commission shall give extra consideration to a nonprofit organization if the permit is required for a habitat restoration project or a project to provide public access to coastal resources.(C) When the commission waives the filing fee for an application for a coastal development permit or permit amendment for a project meeting the criteria in subparagraph (B), the commission may specify whether the waiver also applies to future applications for an amendment to the permit.(d) With respect to an appeal of an action taken by a local government pursuant to Section 30602 or 30603, the executive director shall, within five working days of receipt of an appeal from a person other than a member of the commission or a public agency, determine whether the appeal is patently frivolous. If the executive director determines that an appeal is patently frivolous, the appeal shall not be filed unless a filing fee in the amount of three hundred dollars ($300) is deposited with the commission within five working days of the receipt of the executive director’s determination. If the commission subsequently finds that the appeal raises a substantial issue, the filing fee shall be refunded.SEC. 12. Section 30620.2 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30620.2. The Coastal Access Account is hereby created in the State Coastal Conservancy Fund. The money in the account shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, to the State Coastal Conservancy for grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations for the development, maintenance, and operation of new or existing facilities that provide public access to the shoreline of the sea, as defined in Section 30115. Any grant funds that are not expended for those purposes shall revert to the account.